Illinois, session 104th, SB712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Behavior Analyst Licensing Act is amended 5by changing Sections 20 and 70 and by adding Section 150.1 as 6follows: 7    (225 ILCS 6/20)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)9    Sec. 20. License required; exemptions. 10    (a) Beginning 10 months after the adoption of the rules 11required under subsection (b) of Section 80, an individual 12shall not engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis 13unless licensed under this Act or covered by an exemption 14under subsection (c).15    (a-5) An individual licensed under this Act as an 16assistant behavior analyst shall not engage in the practice of 17applied behavior analysis unless supervised by a licensed 18clinical psychologist or licensed behavior analyst. 19    (b) Beginning 10 months after the adoption of the rules 20required under subsection (b) of Section 80, an individual 21shall not use the title "licensed behavior analyst", "L.B.A.", 22"licensed assistant behavior analyst", "L.A.B.A.", or similar 23words or letters indicating the individual is licensed as a   SB0712 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1behavior analyst or assistant behavior analyst unless the 2individual is actually licensed under this Act.3    (c) This Act does not prohibit any of the following:4        (1) Self-care by a patient or uncompensated care by a 5    friend or family member who does not represent or hold 6    oneself out to be a behavior analyst or assistant behavior 7    analyst.8        (2) An individual from implementing a behavior 9    analytic treatment plan under the extended authority, 10    direction, and supervision of a licensed behavior analyst 11    or licensed assistant behavior analyst.12        (3) A clinical psychologist, social worker, 13    psychiatric nurse, speech-language pathologist, 14    audiologist, professional counselor, clinical 15    professional counselor, clinical social worker, 16    occupational therapist, or marriage and family therapist 17    from performing or advertising activities that are 18    considered to be the practice of applied behavior analysis 19    under this Act if the activities are consistent with the 20    laws of this State, the individual's training, and any 21    code of ethics of the individual's respective professions, 22    so long as the individual does not use the titles provided 23    in subsection (b).24        (4) An individual from performing activities that are 25    considered to be the practice of applied behavior analysis 26    under this Act if the activities are with nonhumans,   SB0712 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    including applied animal behaviorists and animal trainers. 2    The individual may use the title "behavior analyst" but 3    shall not represent oneself as a licensed behavior analyst 4    or licensed assistant behavior analyst unless the 5    individual holds a license issued by the State.6        (5) An individual who provides general applied 7    behavior analysis services to organizations, so long as 8    the services are for the benefit of the organizations and 9    do not involve direct services to individuals. The 10    individual may use the title "behavior analyst" but may 11    not represent oneself as a licensed behavior analyst or 12    licensed assistant behavior analyst unless the individual 13    holds a license issued by the State.14        (6) An individual who is a matriculated student at a 15    nationally accredited university approved in rules or a 16    postdoctoral fellow from performing activities that are 17    considered to be the practice of applied behavior analysis 18    under this Act if the activities are part of a defined 19    program of study, course, practicum, internship, or 20    postdoctoral fellowship, provided that the applied 21    behavior analysis activities are directly supervised by a 22    licensed behavior analyst under this Act or a licensed 23    clinical psychologist.24        (7) An individual who is not licensed under this Act 25    from pursuing field experience in the practice of behavior 26    analysis if the experience is supervised by a licensed   SB0712 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    behavior analyst or a licensed psychologist.2        (8) An individual with a learning behavior specialist 3    or school support personnel endorsement from the State 4    Board of Education, the school district in which the 5    school is located, or a special education joint agreement 6    serving the school district in which the school is located 7    from delivering behavior analytic services in a school 8    setting when employed by that school as long as those 9    services are defined in the scope of practice for that 10    endorsement and that person is not in any manner held out 11    to the public as a licensed behavior analyst or licensed 12    assistant behavior analyst.13        (9) A qualified intellectual disabilities 14    professional, meeting the minimum federal education 15    requirements outlined in 42 CFR 483.430, who is performing 16    the duties required for individuals with intellectual or 17    developmental disabilities in programs and facilities 18    regulated by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 19    Services, the Department of Human Services, or the 20    Department of Public Health, so long as the individual 21    does not use the titles provided in subsection (b).22        (10) A service provider, designated by the Department 23    of Human Services, from providing behavior intervention 24    and treatment, so long as the individual does not use the 25    titles provided in subsection (b).26    (d) This Act does not apply to an individual who, on the   SB0712 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1effective date of this Act, is engaging in the practice of 2applied behavior analysis under the medical assistance program 3under the Illinois Public Aid Code while that individual is 4seeking the education, training, and experience necessary to 5obtain a license under this Act. 6    (e) No licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant 7behavior analyst shall engage in the practice of 8speech-language pathology or the practice of audiology, as 9defined in the Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and 10Audiology Practice Act, unless licensed to do so under that 11Act.12(Source: P.A. 102-953, eff. 5-27-22; 103-857, eff. 8-9-24.) 13    (225 ILCS 6/70)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)15    Sec. 70. Unlicensed practice; violation; civil penalty. 16    (a) Any person who practices, offers to practice, attempts 17to practice, or holds oneself out to practice as a licensed 18behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst 19without being licensed or exempt under this Act shall, in 20addition to any other penalty provided by law, pay a civil 21penalty to the Department in an amount not to exceed $10,000 22for each offense, as determined by the Department. The civil 23penalty shall be assessed by the Department after a hearing is 24held in accordance with the provisions set forth in this Act 25regarding the provision of a hearing for the discipline of a   SB0712 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1licensee. 2    (a-5) Any member, partner, shareholder, director, officer, 3holder of any other ownership interest, or agent of a business 4organization that provides behavior analysis services who 5makes clinical decisions regarding patient care without being 6licensed or exempt under this Act shall be deemed to have 7violated this Section. 8    (b) The Department may investigate any actual, alleged, or 9suspected unlicensed activity. 10    (c) The civil penalty shall be paid within 60 days after 11the effective date of the order imposing the civil penalty. 12The order shall constitute a final judgment and may be filed 13and execution had thereon in the same manner as any judgment 14from any court of record.15(Source: P.A. 102-953, eff. 5-27-22.) 16    (225 ILCS 6/150.1 new)17    Sec. 150.1. Ownership exemption for certain schools and 18nonprofit organizations. Notwithstanding any provision of this 19Act and any rules adopted under this Act, a public school, 20school district, charter school, or nonprofit organization 21that is exempt or qualified for exemption from federal income 22taxes under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code may 23employ or contract with a licensed behavioral analyst 24regardless of whether each individual who owns, operates, or 25manages the public school, school district, charter school, or   SB0712 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1nonprofit organization holds a currently valid license issued 2under this Act. A public school, school district, charter 3school, or nonprofit organization that is exempt or qualified 4for exemption from federal income taxes under Section 5501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code may employ, contract 6with, or otherwise engage a licensed behavioral analyst to 7perform services within his or her scope of practice if the 8licensed behavioral analyst holds a currently valid license 9issued under this Act.  10    Section 10. The Professional Service Corporation Act is 11amended by changing Section 3.6 as follows: 12    (805 ILCS 10/3.6)  (from Ch. 32, par. 415-3.6)13    Sec. 3.6. "Related professions" and "related professional 14services" mean more than one personal service which requires 15as a condition precedent to the rendering thereof the 16obtaining of a license and which prior to October 1, 1973 could 17not be performed by a corporation by reason of law; provided, 18however, that these terms shall be restricted to:19        (1) a combination of 2 or more of the following 20    personal services: (a) "architecture" as defined in 21    Section 5 of the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 22    1989, (b) "professional engineering" as defined in Section 23    4 of the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, 24    (c) "structural engineering" as defined in Section 5 of   SB0712 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989, (d) "land 2    surveying" as defined in Section 2 of the Illinois 3    Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989;4        (2) a combination of the following personal services: 5    (a) the practice of medicine by persons licensed under the 6    Medical Practice Act of 1987, (b) the practice of podiatry 7    as defined in the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, 8    (c) the practice of dentistry as defined in the Illinois 9    Dental Practice Act, (d) the practice of optometry as 10    defined in the Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987;11        (3) a combination of 2 or more of the following 12    personal services: (a) the practice of clinical psychology 13    by persons licensed under the Clinical Psychologist 14    Licensing Act, (b) the practice of social work or clinical 15    social work by persons licensed under the Clinical Social 16    Work and Social Work Practice Act, (c) the practice of 17    marriage and family therapy by persons licensed under the 18    Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act, (d) the 19    practice of professional counseling or clinical 20    professional counseling by persons licensed under the 21    Professional Counselor and Clinical Professional Counselor 22    Licensing and Practice Act, or (e) the practice of sex 23    offender evaluations by persons licensed under the Sex 24    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Provider Act; or25        (4) a combination of 2 or more of the following 26    personal services: (a) the practice of acupuncture by   SB0712 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    persons licensed under the Acupuncture Practice Act, (b) 2    the practice of massage by persons licensed under the 3    Massage Therapy Practice Act, (c) the practice of 4    naprapathy by persons licensed under the Naprapathic 5    Practice Act, (d) the practice of occupational therapy by 6    persons licensed under the Illinois Occupational Therapy 7    Practice Act, (e) the practice of physical therapy by 8    persons licensed under the Illinois Physical Therapy Act, 9    or (f) the practice of speech-language therapy by persons 10    licensed under the Illinois Speech-Language Pathology and 11    Audiology Practice Act, or (g) the practice of applied 12    behavior analysis by persons licensed under the Behavior 13    Analyst Licensing Act.14(Source: P.A. 101-95, eff. 7-19-19; 102-20, eff. 1-1-22.) 15    Section 15. The Professional Limited Liability Company Act 16is amended by changing Section 13 as follows: 17    (805 ILCS 185/13)18    Sec. 13. Nature of business.19    (a) A professional limited liability company may be formed 20to provide a professional service or services licensed by the 21Department except: 22        (1) the practice of dentistry unless all the members 23    and managers are licensed as dentists under the Illinois 24    Dental Practice Act;   SB0712 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1        (2) the practice of medicine unless all the managers, 2    if any, are licensed to practice medicine under the 3    Medical Practice Act of 1987 and each member is either: 4            (A) licensed to practice medicine under the 5        Medical Practice Act of 1987;6            (B) a registered medical corporation or 7        corporations organized pursuant to the Medical 8        Corporation Act;9            (C) a professional corporation organized pursuant 10        to the Professional Service Corporation Act of 11        physicians licensed to practice under the Medical 12        Practice Act of 1987;13            (D) a hospital or hospital affiliate as defined in 14        Section 10.8 of the Hospital Licensing Act; or15            (E) a professional limited liability company that 16        satisfies the requirements of subparagraph (A), (B), 17        (C), or (D); 18        (3) the practice of real estate unless all the members 19    and managers, if any, that actively participate in the 20    real estate activities of the professional limited 21    liability company are licensed to practice as a managing 22    broker or broker pursuant to the Real Estate License Act 23    of 2000. All nonparticipating members or managers shall 24    submit affidavits of nonparticipation as required by the 25    Department and the Real Estate License Act of 2000;26        (4) the practice of clinical psychology unless all the   SB0712 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    managers and members are licensed to practice as a 2    clinical psychologist under the Clinical Psychologist 3    Licensing Act;4        (5) the practice of social work unless all the 5    managers and members are licensed to practice as a 6    clinical social worker or social worker under the Clinical 7    Social Work and Social Work Practice Act;8        (6) the practice of marriage and family therapy unless 9    all the managers and members are licensed to practice as a 10    marriage and family therapist under the Marriage and 11    Family Therapy Licensing Act;12        (7) the practice of professional counseling unless all 13    the managers and members are licensed to practice as a 14    clinical professional counselor or a professional 15    counselor under the Professional Counselor and Clinical 16    Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act;17        (8) the practice of sex offender evaluation and 18    treatment unless all the managers and members are licensed 19    to practice as a sex offender evaluator or sex offender 20    treatment provider under the Sex Offender Evaluation and 21    Treatment Provider Act; or22        (9) the practice of veterinary medicine unless all the 23    managers and members are licensed to practice as a 24    veterinarian under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery 25    Practice Act of 2004. 26    (b) Notwithstanding any provision of this Section, any of   SB0712 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1the following professional services may be combined and 2offered within a single professional limited liability company 3provided that each professional service is offered only by 4persons licensed to provide that professional service and all 5managers and members are licensed in at least one of the 6professional services offered by the professional limited 7liability company: 8        (1) the practice of medicine by physicians licensed 9    under the Medical Practice Act of 1987, the practice of 10    podiatry by podiatric physicians licensed under the 11    Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987, the practice of 12    dentistry by dentists licensed under the Illinois Dental 13    Practice Act, and the practice of optometry by 14    optometrists licensed under the Illinois Optometric 15    Practice Act of 1987; 16        (2) the practice of clinical psychology by clinical 17    psychologists licensed under the Clinical Psychologist 18    Licensing Act, the practice of social work by clinical 19    social workers or social workers licensed under the 20    Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act, the 21    practice of marriage and family counseling by marriage and 22    family therapists licensed under the Marriage and Family 23    Therapy Licensing Act, the practice of professional 24    counseling by professional counselors and clinical 25    professional counselors licensed under the Professional 26    Counselor and Clinical Professional Counselor Licensing   SB0712 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    and Practice Act, and the practice of sex offender 2    evaluation and treatment by sex offender evaluators and 3    sex offender treatment providers licensed under the Sex 4    Offender Evaluation and Treatment Provider Act;5        (3) the practice of architecture by persons licensed 6    under the Illinois Architecture Practice Act of 1989, the 7    practice of professional engineering by persons licensed 8    under the Professional Engineering Practice Act of 1989, 9    the practice of structural engineering by persons licensed 10    under the Structural Engineering Practice Act of 1989, and 11    the practice of land surveying by persons licensed under 12    the Illinois Professional Land Surveyor Act of 1989; or13        (4) the practice of acupuncture by persons licensed 14    under the Acupuncture Practice Act, the practice of 15    massage by persons licensed under the Massage Licensing 16    Act, the practice of naprapathy by persons licensed under 17    the Naprapathic Practice Act, the practice of occupational 18    therapy by persons licensed under the Illinois 19    Occupational Therapy Practice Act, the practice of 20    physical therapy by persons licensed under the Illinois 21    Physical Therapy Act, the practice of applied behavior 22    analysis by persons licensed under the Behavior Analyst 23    Licensing Act, and the practice of speech-language 24    pathology by persons licensed under the Illinois 25    Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act.26(Source: P.A. 102-970, eff. 5-27-22.)   SB0712 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07011 BAB 17048 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.